Illinois, session 104th, SB1766.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Sections 8-1, 8-2, 8-3, 8-4, 8-5, 8-6, 8-7, 8-9, 68-10, 8-11, 8-12, and 8-14 and by adding Article XIII as 7follows: 8    (235 ILCS 5/8-1)9    Sec. 8-1. A tax is imposed upon the privilege of engaging 10in business as a manufacturer or as an importing distributor 11of alcoholic liquor other than beer at the rate of $0.185 per 12gallon until September 1, 2009 and $0.231 per gallon beginning 13September 1, 2009 for cider containing not less than 0.5% 14alcohol by volume nor more than 7% alcohol by volume, $0.73 per 15gallon until September 1, 2009 and $1.39 per gallon beginning 16September 1, 2009 for wine other than cider containing less 17than 7% alcohol by volume, and $4.50 per gallon until 18September 1, 2009 and $8.55 per gallon beginning September 1, 192009 on alcohol and spirits manufactured and sold or used by 20such manufacturer, or as agent for any other person, or sold or 21used by such importing distributor, or as agent for any other 22person. A tax is imposed upon the privilege of engaging in 23business as a manufacturer of beer or as an importing   SB1766- 2 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1distributor of beer at the rate of $0.185 per gallon until 2September 1, 2009 and $0.231 per gallon beginning September 1, 32009 on all beer, regardless of alcohol by volume, 4manufactured and sold or used by such manufacturer, or as 5agent for any other person, or sold or used by such importing 6distributor, or as agent for any other person. Any brewer 7manufacturing beer in this State shall be entitled to and 8given a credit or refund of 75% of the tax imposed on each 9gallon of beer up to 4.9 million gallons per year in any given 10calendar year for tax paid or payable on beer produced and sold 11in the State of Illinois.12    A tax is imposed upon the privilege of engaging in 13business as a hemp beverage manufacturer or as a hemp beverage 14importing distributor at the rate of $8.55 for each gallon 15containing 80 mg of THC or less and not less than 70 mg of THC, 16$7.48 for each gallon containing less than 70 mg of THC and not 17less than 60 mg of THC, $6.41 for each gallon containing less 18than 60 mg of THC and not less than 50 mg of THC, $5.34 for 19each gallon containing less than 50 mg of THC and not less than 2040 mg of THC, $4.27 for each gallon containing less than 40 mg 21of THC, manufactured by a hemp manufacturer and sold or used by 22such hemp manufacturer, or as agent for any other person, or 23sold or used by such importing hemp distributor, or as agent 24for any other person. 25    For purposes of this Section, "beer" means beer, ale, 26porter, stout, and other similar fermented beverages of any   SB1766- 3 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1name or description containing one-half of one percent or more 2of alcohol by volume, brewed or produced from malt, wholly or 3in part, or from any substitute for malt. 4    For the purpose of this Section, "cider" means any 5alcoholic beverage obtained by the alcohol fermentation of the 6juice of apples or pears including, but not limited to, 7flavored, sparkling, or carbonated cider.8    The credit or refund created by this Act shall apply to all 9beer taxes in the calendar years 1982 through 1986.10    The increases made by this amendatory Act of the 91st 11General Assembly in the rates of taxes imposed under this 12Section shall apply beginning on July 1, 1999.13    A tax at the rate of 1¢ per gallon on beer and 48¢ per 14gallon on hemp beverages, alcohol, and spirits is also imposed 15upon the privilege of engaging in business as a retailer or 16hemp beverage retailer or as a distributor or hemp beverage 17distributor who is not also an importing distributor or hemp 18beverage importing distributor with respect to all beer, and 19all alcohol, and spirits, and hemp beverages owned or 20possessed by such retailer, hemp beverage retailer, or 21distributor, or hemp beverage distributor when this amendatory 22Act of 1969, or any amendatory Act applicable to hemp 23beverages, becomes effective, and with respect to which the 24additional tax imposed by this amendatory Act upon 25manufacturers, hemp beverage manufacturers, and importing 26distributors, and hemp beverage importing distributors does   SB1766- 4 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1not apply. Retailers, hemp beverage retailers, and 2distributors, and hemp beverage distributors who are subject 3to the additional tax imposed by this paragraph of this 4Section shall be required to inventory such alcoholic liquor 5or hemp beverage and to pay this additional tax in a manner 6prescribed by the Department.7    The provisions of this Section shall be construed to apply 8to any importing distributor or importing hemp distributor 9engaging in business in this State, whether licensed or not.10    However, such tax is not imposed upon any such business as 11to any alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage shipped outside 12Illinois by an Illinois licensed manufacturer, hemp beverage 13manufacturer, or importing distributor, or hemp beverage 14importing distributor, nor as to any alcoholic liquor or hemp 15beverage delivered in Illinois by an Illinois licensed 16manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, or importing 17distributor, or hemp beverage distributor to a purchaser for 18immediate transportation by the purchaser to another state 19into which the purchaser has a legal right, under the laws of 20such state, to import such alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage, 21nor as to any alcoholic liquor other than beer or hemp beverage 22sold by one Illinois licensed manufacturer, hemp beverage 23manufacturer, or importing distributor, or hemp beverage 24importing distributor to another Illinois licensed 25manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, or importing 26distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor, to the   SB1766- 5 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1extent to which the sale of alcoholic liquor other than beer or 2hemp beverage by one Illinois licensed manufacturer, hemp 3beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 4importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor to 5another Illinois licensed manufacturer, hemp beverage 6manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 7importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor is 8authorized by the licensing provisions of this Act, nor to 9alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage whether manufactured in or 10imported into this State when sold to a "non-beverage user" 11licensed by the State for use in the manufacture of any of the 12following when they are unfit for beverage purposes:13    Patent and proprietary medicines and medicinal, 14antiseptic, culinary and toilet preparations;15    Flavoring extracts and syrups and food products;16    Scientific, industrial and chemical products, excepting 17denatured alcohol;18    Or for scientific, chemical, experimental or mechanical 19purposes;20    Nor is the tax imposed upon the privilege of engaging in 21any business in interstate commerce or otherwise, which 22business may not, under the Constitution and Statutes of the 23United States, be made the subject of taxation by this State.24    The tax herein imposed shall be in addition to all other 25occupation or privilege taxes imposed by the State of Illinois 26or political subdivision thereof.  SB1766- 6 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    If any alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage alcoholic liquor 2manufactured in or imported into this State is sold to a 3licensed manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, or 4importing distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 5by a licensed manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, 6manufacturer or importing distributor, or hemp beverage 7distributor to be used solely as an ingredient in the 8manufacture of any beverage for human consumption, the tax 9imposed upon such purchasing manufacturer, hemp beverage 10manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 11importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor 12shall be reduced by the amount of the taxes which have been 13paid by the selling manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, 14importing distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 15manufacturer or importing distributor under this Act as to 16such alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage so used to the 17Department of Revenue.18    If any person received any alcoholic liquors or hemp 19beverages from a manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, 20importing distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 21manufacturer or importing distributor, with respect to which 22alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages no tax is imposed under 23this Article, and such alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage shall 24thereafter be disposed of in such manner or under such 25circumstances as may cause the same to become the base for the 26tax imposed by this Article, such person shall make the same   SB1766- 7 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1reports and returns, pay the same taxes and be subject to all 2other provisions of this Article relating to manufacturers and 3importing distributors.4    Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require the 5payment to the Department of the taxes imposed by this Article 6more than once with respect to any quantity of alcoholic 7liquor or hemp beverage sold or used within this State.8    No tax is imposed by this Act on sales of alcoholic liquor 9or hemp beverage by Illinois licensed foreign importers to 10Illinois licensed importing distributors.11    All of the proceeds of the additional tax imposed by 12Public Act 96-34 shall be deposited by the Department into the 13Capital Projects Fund. The remainder of the tax imposed by 14this Act shall be deposited by the Department into the General 15Revenue Fund. 16    A manufacturer of beer that imports or transfers beer into 17this State must comply with the provisions of this Section 18with regard to the beer imported into this State. 19    The provisions of this Section 8-1 are severable under 20Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 21(Source: P.A. 100-885, eff. 8-14-18; 101-16, eff. 6-14-19.) 22    (235 ILCS 5/8-2)  (from Ch. 43, par. 159)23    Sec. 8-2. Payments; reports. It is the duty of each 24manufacturer with respect to alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage 25produced or imported by such manufacturer, or purchased   SB1766- 8 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1tax-free by such manufacturer from another manufacturer, hemp 2beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 3importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor, 4and of each importing distributor as to alcoholic liquor or 5hemp beverage purchased by such importing distributor from 6foreign importers or from anyone from any point in the United 7States outside of this State or purchased tax-free from 8another manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 9distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 10manufacturer or importing distributor, to pay the tax imposed 11by Section 8-1 to the Department of Revenue on or before the 1215th day of the calendar month following the calendar month in 13which such alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage is sold or used by 14such manufacturer or by such importing distributor other than 15in an authorized tax-free manner or to pay that tax 16electronically as provided in this Section.17    Each manufacturer and each importing distributor shall 18make payment under one of the following methods: (1) on or 19before the 15th day of each calendar month, file in person or 20by United States first-class mail, postage pre-paid, with the 21Department of Revenue, on forms prescribed and furnished by 22the Department, a report in writing in such form as may be 23required by the Department in order to compute, and assure the 24accuracy of, the tax due on all taxable sales and uses of 25alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage occurring during the 26preceding month. Payment of the tax in the amount disclosed by   SB1766- 9 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1the report shall accompany the report or, (2) on or before the 215th day of each calendar month, electronically file with the 3Department of Revenue, on forms prescribed and furnished by 4the Department, an electronic report in such form as may be 5required by the Department in order to compute, and assure the 6accuracy of, the tax due on all taxable sales and uses of 7alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage occurring during the 8preceding month. An electronic payment of the tax in the 9amount disclosed by the report shall accompany the report. A 10manufacturer or distributor who files an electronic report and 11electronically pays the tax imposed pursuant to Section 8-1 to 12the Department of Revenue on or before the 15th day of the 13calendar month following the calendar month in which such 14alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage is sold or used by that 15manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 16distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 17manufacturer or importing distributor other than in an 18authorized tax-free manner shall pay to the Department the 19amount of the tax imposed pursuant to Section 8-1, less a 20discount which is allowed to reimburse the manufacturer, hemp 21beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 22importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor 23for the expenses incurred in keeping and maintaining records, 24preparing and filing the electronic returns, remitting the 25tax, and supplying data to the Department upon request.26    The discount shall be in an amount as follows:  SB1766- 10 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1        (1) For original returns due on or after January 1, 2    2003 through September 30, 2003, the discount shall be 3    1.75% or $1,250 per return, whichever is less;4        (2) For original returns due on or after October 1, 5    2003 through September 30, 2004, the discount shall be 2% 6    or $3,000 per return, whichever is less; and7        (3) For original returns due on or after October 1, 8    2004, the discount shall be 2% or $2,000 per return, 9    whichever is less.10    The Department may, if it deems it necessary in order to 11insure the payment of the tax imposed by this Article, require 12returns to be made more frequently than and covering periods 13of less than a month. Such return shall contain such further 14information as the Department may reasonably require.15    It shall be presumed that all alcoholic liquors or hemp 16beverages acquired or made by any hemp beverage importing 17distributor, importing distributor, hemp beverage 18manufacturer, or manufacturer importing distributor or 19manufacturer have been sold or used by him in this State and 20are the basis for the tax imposed by this Article unless 21proven, to the satisfaction of the Department, that such 22alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages are (1) still in the 23possession of such importing distributor or manufacturer, or 24(2) prior to the termination of possession have been lost by 25theft or through unintentional destruction, or (3) that such 26alcoholic liquor or hemp beverages alcoholic liquors are   SB1766- 11 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1otherwise exempt from taxation under this Act.2    If any payment provided for in this Section exceeds the 3manufacturer's, hemp beverage manufacturer's, importing 4distributor's, or hemp beverage importing distributor's 5manufacturer's or importing distributor's liabilities under 6this Act, as shown on an original report, the manufacturer, 7hemp beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp 8beverage importing distributor manufacturer or importing 9distributor may credit such excess payment against liability 10subsequently to be remitted to the Department under this Act, 11in accordance with reasonable rules adopted by the Department. 12If the Department subsequently determines that all or any part 13of the credit taken was not actually due to the manufacturer, 14hemp beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp 15beverage importing distributor manufacturer or importing 16distributor, the manufacturer's, hemp beverage manufacturer's, 17importing distributor's, or hemp beverage importing 18distributor's manufacturer's or importing distributor's 19discount shall be reduced by an amount equal to the difference 20between the discount as applied to the credit taken and that 21actually due, and the manufacturer, hemp beverage 22manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 23importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor 24shall be liable for penalties and interest on such difference. 25    The Department may require any foreign importer to file 26monthly information returns, by the 15th day of the month   SB1766- 12 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1following the month which any such return covers, if the 2Department determines this to be necessary to the proper 3performance of the Department's functions and duties under 4this Act. Such return shall contain such information as the 5Department may reasonably require.6    Every entity licensed or registered as a manufacturer, 7hemp beverage manufacturer, and importing distributor, or hemp 8beverage importing distributor, except for a manufacturer, 9hemp beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp 10beverage importing distributor manufacturer or importing 11distributor that in the preceding year had less than $50,000 12of tax liability under this Article, shall also file, with the 13Department, a bond in an amount not less than $1,000 and not to 14exceed $100,000 on a form to be approved by, and with a surety 15or sureties satisfactory to, the Department. The Department 16shall not require more than one bond in the event an entity is 17licensed under this Act and registered under Article XIII. 18Such bond shall be conditioned upon the manufacturer, hemp 19beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 20importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor 21paying to the Department all moneys monies becoming due from 22such manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 23distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 24manufacturer or importing distributor under this Article. The 25Department shall fix the penalty of such bond in each case, 26taking into consideration the amount of alcoholic liquor or   SB1766- 13 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1hemp beverage alcoholic liquor expected to be sold and used by 2such manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 3distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 4manufacturer or importing distributor, and the penalty fixed 5by the Department shall be sufficient, in the Department's 6opinion, to protect the State of Illinois against failure to 7pay any amount due under this Article, but the amount of the 8penalty fixed by the Department shall not exceed twice the 9amount of tax liability of a monthly return, nor shall the 10amount of such penalty be less than $1,000. The Department 11shall notify the State Commission of the Department's approval 12or disapproval of any such manufacturer's, hemp beverage 13manufacturer's, importing distributor's, or hemp beverage 14importing distributor's manufacturer's or importing 15distributor's bond, or of the termination or cancellation of 16any such bond, or of the Department's direction to 17manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 18distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor a 19manufacturer or importing distributor that he must file 20additional bond in order to comply with this Section. The 21State Commission shall not issue a license to any applicant 22for a manufacturer's or importing distributor's license and 23the Hemp Beverage Commission shall not issue to a registration 24to any applicant for a hemp beverage manufacturer's or hemp 25beverage importing distributor's registration manufacturer's 26or importing distributor's license unless the State Commission   SB1766- 14 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1or the Hemp Beverage Commission with respect to a an 2application for a registration, has received a notification 3from the Department showing that such applicant has filed a 4satisfactory bond with the Department hereunder and that such 5bond has been approved by the Department. Failure by any 6licensed manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 7distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 8manufacturer or importing distributor to keep a satisfactory 9bond in effect with the Department or to furnish additional 10bond to the Department, when required hereunder by the 11Department to do so, shall be grounds for the revocation or 12suspension of such manufacturer's or importing distributor's 13license by the State Commission or such hemp beverage 14manufacturer's or hemp beverage importing distributor's 15registration manufacturer's or importing distributor's license 16by the Hemp Beverage Commission. If a manufacturer, hemp 17beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 18importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor 19fails to pay any amount due under this Article, his bond with 20the Department shall be deemed forfeited, and the Department 21may institute a suit in its own name on such bond.22    After notice and opportunity for a hearing the State 23Commission may revoke or suspend the license of any 24manufacturer or importing distributor and the Hemp Beverage 25Commission may revoke or suspend the registration of a hemp 26beverage manufacturer or hemp beverage importing distributor   SB1766- 15 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1who fails to comply with the provisions of this Section. 2Notice of such hearing and the time and place thereof shall be 3in writing and shall contain a statement of the charges 4against the licensee or registrant. Such notice may be given 5by United States registered or certified mail with return 6receipt requested, addressed to the person concerned at his 7last known address and shall be given not less than 7 days 8prior to the date fixed for the hearing. An order revoking or 9suspending a license or registration under the provisions of 10this Section may be reviewed in the manner provided in Section 117-10 of this Act. No new license shall be granted to a person 12whose license or registration has been revoked for a violation 13of this Section or, in case of suspension, shall such 14suspension be terminated until he has paid to the Department 15all taxes and penalties which he owes the State under the 16provisions of this Act.17    Every manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 18distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 19manufacturer or importing distributor who has, as verified by 20the Department, continuously complied with the conditions of 21the bond under this Act for a period of 2 years shall be 22considered to be a prior continuous compliance taxpayer. In 23determining the consecutive period of time for qualification 24as a prior continuous compliance taxpayer, any consecutive 25period of time of qualifying compliance immediately prior to 26the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1987 shall be   SB1766- 16 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1credited to any manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, 2importing distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 3manufacturer or importing distributor.4    A manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, importing 5distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 6manufacturer or importing distributor that is a prior 7continuous compliance taxpayer under this Section and becomes 8a successor as the result of an acquisition, merger, or 9consolidation of a manufacturer, hemp beverage manufacturer, 10importing distributor, or hemp beverage importing distributor 11manufacturer or importing distributor shall be deemed to be a 12prior continuous compliance taxpayer with respect to the 13acquired, merged, or consolidated entity. 14    Every prior continuous compliance taxpayer shall be exempt 15from the bond requirements of this Act until the Department 16has determined the taxpayer to be delinquent in the filing of 17any return or deficient in the payment of any tax under this 18Act. Any taxpayer who fails to pay an admitted or established 19liability under this Act may also be required to post bond or 20other acceptable security with the Department guaranteeing the 21payment of such admitted or established liability.22    The Department shall discharge any surety and shall 23release and return any bond or security deposit assigned, 24pledged or otherwise provided to it by a taxpayer under this 25Section within 30 days after: (1) such taxpayer becomes a 26prior continuous compliance taxpayer; or (2) such taxpayer has   SB1766- 17 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1ceased to collect receipts on which he is required to remit tax 2to the Department, has filed a final tax return, and has paid 3to the Department an amount sufficient to discharge his 4remaining tax liability as determined by the Department under 5this Act.6(Source: P.A. 100-1171, eff. 1-4-19; 101-37, eff. 7-3-19.) 7    (235 ILCS 5/8-4)  (from Ch. 43, par. 163)8    Sec. 8-4. If a person fails to file a return as required by 9this Article, or having filed an incorrect or insufficient 10return, fails to file a corrected or sufficient return, as the 11case may require, within 10 days after the giving of notice to 12him by the Department that such corrected or sufficient return 13is required, the Department shall determine the amount of tax 14due at any time within 3 years after the making of the earliest 15disposition of alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage included in 16such determination, and shall give written notice, by means of 17a notice of tax liability, of such determination to such 18person. Protest thereto and demand for a hearing may be made 19and final assessments arrived at in accordance with Section 208-5.21(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 22    (235 ILCS 5/8-5)  (from Ch. 43, par. 163a)23    Sec. 8-5. As soon as practicable after any return is 24filed, the Department shall examine such return or amended   SB1766- 18 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1return and shall correct such return according to its best 2judgment and information, which return so corrected by the 3Department shall be prima facie correct and shall be prima 4facie evidence of the correctness of the amount of tax due, as 5shown therein. Instead of requiring the licensee to file an 6amended return, the Department may simply notify the licensee 7of the correction or corrections it has made. Proof of such 8correction by the Department, or of the determination of the 9amount of tax due as provided in Sections 8-4 and 8-10, may be 10made at any hearing before the Department or in any legal 11proceeding by a reproduced copy of the Department's record 12relating thereto in the name of the Department under the 13certificate of the Director of Revenue. Such reproduced copy 14shall, without further proof, be admitted into evidence before 15the Department or in any legal proceeding and shall be prima 16facie proof of the correctness of the amount of tax due, as 17shown therein. If the return so corrected by the Department 18discloses the sale or use, by a licensed manufacturer, hemp 19beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, or hemp beverage 20importing distributor manufacturer or importing distributor, 21of alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages as to which the tax 22provided for in this Article should have been paid, but has not 23been paid, in excess of the alcoholic liquors or hemp 24beverages reported as being taxable by the licensee, and as to 25which the proper tax was paid the Department shall notify the 26licensee that it shall issue the taxpayer a notice of tax   SB1766- 19 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1liability for the amount of tax claimed by the Department to be 2due, together with penalties at the rates prescribed by 3Sections 3-3, 3-5 and 3-6 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest 4Act, which amount of tax shall be equivalent to the amount of 5tax which, at the prescribed rate per gallon, should have been 6paid with respect to the alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages 7disposed of in excess of those reported as being taxable. No 8earlier than 90 days after the due date of the return, the 9Department may compare filed returns, or any amendments 10thereto, against reports of sales of alcoholic liquor or hemp 11beverage submitted to the Department by other manufacturers 12and distributors. If a return or amended return is corrected 13by the Department because the return or amended return failed 14to disclose the purchase of alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage 15from manufacturers or distributors on which the tax provided 16for in this Article should have been paid, but has not been 17paid, the Department shall issue the taxpayer a notice of tax 18liability for the amount of tax claimed by the Department to be 19due, together with penalties at the rates prescribed by 20Sections 3-3, 3-5, and 3-6 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest 21Act. In a case where no return has been filed, the Department 22shall determine the amount of tax due according to its best 23judgment and information and shall issue the taxpayer a notice 24of tax liability for the amount of tax claimed by the 25Department to be due as herein provided together with 26penalties at the rates prescribed by Sections 3-3, 3-5 and 3-6   SB1766- 20 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act. If, in administering 2the provisions of this Act, a comparison of a licensee's 3return or returns with the books, records and physical 4inventories of such licensee discloses a deficiency which 5cannot be allocated by the Department to a particular month or 6months, the Department shall issue the taxpayer a notice of 7tax liability for the amount of tax claimed by the Department 8to be due for a given period, but without any obligation upon 9the Department to allocate such deficiency to any particular 10month or months, together with penalties at the rates 11prescribed by Sections 3-3, 3-5 and 3-6 of the Uniform Penalty 12and Interest Act, which amount of tax shall be equivalent to 13the amount of tax which, at the prescribed rate per gallon, 14should have been paid with respect to the alcoholic liquors or 15hemp beverages disposed of in excess of those reported being 16taxable, with the tax thereon having been paid under which 17circumstances the aforesaid notice of tax liability shall be 18prima facie correct and shall be prima facie evidence of the 19correctness of the amount of tax due as shown therein; and 20proof of such correctness may be made in accordance with, and 21the admissibility of a reproduced copy of such notice of the 22Department's notice of tax liability shall be governed by, all 23the provisions of this Act applicable to corrected returns.24    If the licensee dies or becomes a person under legal 25disability at any time before the Department issues its notice 26of tax liability, such notice shall be issued to the   SB1766- 21 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1administrator, executor or other legal representative, as 2such, of the deceased or licensee who is under legal 3disability.4    If such licensee or legal representative, within 60 days 5after such notice of tax liability, files a protest to such 6notice of tax liability and requests a hearing thereon, the 7Department shall give at least 7 days' notice to such licensee 8or legal representative, as the case may be, of the time and 9place fixed for such hearing and shall hold a hearing in 10conformity with the provisions of this Act, and pursuant 11thereto shall issue a final assessment to such licensee or 12legal representative for the amount found to be due as a result 13of such hearing.14    If a protest to the notice of tax liability and a request 15for a hearing thereon is not filed within 60 days after such 16notice of tax liability, such notice of tax liability shall 17become final without the necessity of a final assessment being 18issued and shall be deemed to be a final assessment.19    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act, any 20amount paid as tax or in respect of tax paid under this Act 21shall be deemed assessed upon the date of receipt of payment. 22    In case of failure to pay the tax, or any portion thereof, 23or any penalty provided for herein, when due, the Department 24may recover the amount of such tax, or portion thereof, or 25penalty in a civil action; or if the licensee dies or becomes a 26person under legal disability, by filing a claim therefor   SB1766- 22 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1against his or her estate; provided that no such claim shall be 2filed against the estate of any deceased or of the licensee who 3is under legal disability for any tax or penalty or portion 4thereof except in the manner prescribed and within the time 5limited by the Probate Act of 1975, as amended.6    The collection of any such tax and penalty, or either, by 7any means provided for herein, shall not be a bar to any 8prosecution under this Act.9    In addition to any other penalty provided for in this 10Article, all provisions of the Uniform Penalty and Interest 11Act that are not inconsistent with this Act apply.12(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (235 ILCS 5/8-6)  (from Ch. 43, par. 163b)14    Sec. 8-6. The Department, or any officer or employee 15designated in writing by the Director thereof, for the purpose 16of administering and enforcing the provisions of this Act, may 17hold investigations and hearings concerning any matters 18covered by this Act. In holding or conducting any hearing or 19investigation authorized under this Act, the Department or any 20officer or employee of the Department designated, in writing, 21by the Director thereof, may examine any books, papers, 22records or memoranda bearing upon the manufacture, 23importation, sale or use of alcoholic liquors or hemp 24beverages by any licensee or registrant, and may require the 25attendance of such licensee or registrant or of any officer,   SB1766- 23 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1agent or employee of such licensee or registrant, or of any 2person having knowledge of such facts, and may take testimony 3and require proof for its information. In the conduct of any 4investigation or hearing, neither the Department nor any 5officer or employee thereof shall be bound by the technical 6rules of evidence, and no informality in any proceeding, or in 7the manner of taking testimony, shall invalidate any 8assessment, order, decision, rule or regulation made or 9approved or confirmed by the Department. The Director of 10Revenue or any duly designated officer or employee of the 11Department shall have power to administer oaths to such 12persons; and the Department shall have the power to issue 13subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum, and the Department, or 14any other party to a proceeding pending before the Department, 15may apply to the circuit court to compel the attendance and 16testimony of witnesses and the production of books, papers, 17records and memoranda, by an attachment for contempt as 18provided for such purposes in civil cases.19    The Department or any officer or employee thereof, or any 20party in an investigation or hearing before the Department, 21may cause the depositions of witnesses within the State to be 22taken in the manner prescribed by law for like depositions in 23civil actions in courts of this State, and to that end compel 24the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, 25papers, records and memoranda.26    The books, papers, records and memoranda of the   SB1766- 24 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1Department, or parts thereof, may be proved in any hearing, 2investigation or judicial proceeding by a reproduced copy 3thereof under the certificate of the Director of Revenue. Such 4reproduced copy shall, without further proof, be admitted into 5evidence before the Department or in any judicial proceeding.6(Source: P.A. 83-334.) 7    (235 ILCS 5/8-7)  (from Ch. 43, par. 163c)8    Sec. 8-7. All hearings provided for in Section 8-5 of this 9Act shall be held in the county wherein the licensee or 10registrant has his principal place of business; provided, that 11if the licensee or registrant does not have his or her 12principal place of business in this State, such hearing shall 13be held in Sangamon County.14    The Circuit Court of the county wherein any hearing is 15held by the Department shall have power to review all final 16administrative decisions of the Department in administering 17the provisions of this Act. If the administrative proceeding 18which is to be reviewed judicially is a claim for refund 19proceeding commenced in accordance with Section 8-3 of this 20Act and Section 2a of "An Act in relation to the payment and 21disposition of moneys received by officers and employees of 22the State of Illinois by virtue of their office or 23employment", approved June 9, 1911, as amended, the Circuit 24Court having jurisdiction of the proceeding for judicial 25review under this Section and under the Administrative Review   SB1766- 25 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1Law, as amended, shall be the same court that entered the 2injunction which is provided for in Section 2a of "An Act in 3relation to the payment and disposition of moneys received by 4officers and employees of the State of Illinois by virtue of 5their office or employment", and which enables such claim 6proceeding to be processed and disposed of as a claim for 7refund proceeding rather than as a claim for credit 8proceeding.9    The provisions of the Administrative Review Law, and all 10amendments and modifications thereof, and the rules adopted 11pursuant thereto, shall apply to and govern all proceedings 12for the judicial review of final administrative decisions of 13the Department hereunder. The term "administrative decision" 14is defined as in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.15    Service of summons issued in such review proceeding upon 16the Director of Revenue or the Assistant Director of Revenue 17of the Department of Revenue shall be service upon the 18Department. The Department shall certify the record of its 19proceedings if the licensee or registrant shall pay to it the 20sum of 75¢ per page of testimony taken before the Department 21and 25¢ per page of all other matters contained in such record, 22except that these charges may be waived where the Department 23is satisfied that the aggrieved party is a poor person who 24cannot afford to pay such charges. Provided, however, before 25the delivery of such record to the person applying for same, 26the payment therefor shall be made as hereinabove provided,   SB1766- 26 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1and in the event of nonpayment for the record as hereinabove 2provided within 30 days after notice that such record is 3available, the complaint may be dismissed by the court upon 4motion of the Department.5    No stay order shall be entered by the Circuit Court unless 6the plaintiff in the review proceedings shall file with the 7court a bond in an amount fixed and approved by the court to 8indemnify the State against all loss and injury which may be 9sustained by it on account of the review proceedings and to 10secure all costs which may be occasioned by such proceedings.11    Whenever notice is required by this Act, such notice may 12be given by United States registered or certified mail with 13return receipt requested, addressed to the person concerned at 14his or her last known address, and proof of such mailing shall 15be sufficient for the purposes of this Act.16    Whenever any proceeding provided by this Act is commenced 17before the Department, either by the Department or by a person 18subject to this Act, and such person thereafter dies or 19becomes a person under legal disability before such proceeding 20is concluded, the legal representative of the deceased or the 21guardian of the person under legal disability shall notify the 22Department of such death or legal disability. The legal 23representative, as such, shall then be substituted by the 24Department for such person. If the legal representative fails 25to notify the Department of his or her appointment as such 26legal representative, the Department may, upon its own motion,   SB1766- 27 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1substitute such legal representative in the proceeding pending 2before the Department for the person who died or became a 3person under legal disability.4(Source: P.A. 83-345.) 5    (235 ILCS 5/8-9)  (from Ch. 43, par. 163e)6    Sec. 8-9. Tax information; confidentiality. All 7information received by the Department from returns filed 8under this Act, or from any investigation conducted under this 9Act, shall be confidential, except for official purposes, and 10any person who divulges any such information in any manner, 11except in accordance with a proper judicial order or as 12otherwise provided by law, shall be guilty of a Class B 13misdemeanor.14    Nothing in this Act prevents the Director of Revenue from 15publishing or making available to the public the names and 16addresses of persons filing returns under this Act, or 17reasonable statistics concerning the operation of the tax by 18grouping the contents of returns so that the information in 19any individual return is not disclosed.20    Nothing in this Act prevents the Director of Revenue from 21divulging to the United States Government or the government of 22any other state, or any officer or agency thereof, for 23exclusively official purposes, information received by the 24Department in administering this Act, provided that such other 25governmental agency agrees to divulge requested tax   SB1766- 28 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1information to the Department.2    The furnishing upon request of information obtained by the 3Department from returns filed under this Act or investigations 4conducted under this Act to the Illinois Liquor Control 5Commission or the Hemp Beverage Commission for official use is 6deemed to be an official purpose within the meaning of this 7Section.8    The furnishing upon request of the Auditor General, or his 9authorized agents, for official use, of returns filed and 10information related thereto under this Act is deemed to be an 11official purpose within the meaning of this Section.12    The furnishing of financial information to a home rule 13unit with a population in excess of 2,000,000 that has imposed 14a tax similar to that imposed by this Act under its home rule 15powers, upon request of the Chief Executive of the home rule 16unit, is an official purpose within the meaning of this 17Section, provided the home rule unit agrees in writing to the 18requirements of this Section. Information so provided is 19subject to all confidentiality provisions of this Section. The 20written agreement shall provide for reciprocity, limitations 21on access, disclosure, and procedures for requesting 22information.23    Nothing contained in this Act shall prevent the Director 24from divulging information to any person pursuant to a request 25or authorization made by the taxpayer or by an authorized 26representative of the taxpayer.  SB1766- 29 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1(Source: P.A. 94-1074, eff. 12-26-06.) 2    (235 ILCS 5/8-10)  (from Ch. 43, par. 164)3    Sec. 8-10. It is the duty of each manufacturer, hemp 4beverage manufacturer, importing distributor, hemp beverage 5importing distributor, and foreign importer to keep, at his or 6her licensed address or place of business, complete and 7accurate records of all sales or other dispositions of 8alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage, and complete and accurate 9records of all alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage produced, 10manufactured, compounded or imported, whether for himself or 11for another, together with a physical inventory made as of the 12close of each period for which a return is required, covering 13all alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages alcoholic liquors on 14hand. However, the Department of Revenue may grant an 15importing distributor or a hemp beverage importing distributor 16a waiver to permit such records to be kept at a central 17business location within the State upon written request by the 18importing distributor or the hemp beverage importing 19distributor. The central business location shall be located at 20a licensed importing distributor's or hemp beverage importing 21distributor's premises. The Department of Revenue may in its 22discretion prescribe reasonable and uniform methods for 23keeping such records by manufacturers and importing 24distributors and foreign importers.25    In case of failure by manufacturers, hemp beverage   SB1766- 30 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1manufacturers, hemp beverage importing distributor, and 2importing distributors to keep such records or to make them 3available to the Department on demand, the Department shall 4determine the amount of tax due according to its best judgment 5and information, which amount so determined by the Department 6shall be prima facie correct, and the Department's notice of 7tax liability shall be given, and protest thereto and demand 8for a hearing may be made and final assessments arrived at, in 9accordance with the provisions of Section 8-5 hereof.10    It is the duty of each manufacturer, hemp beverage 11manufacturer, importing distributor, hemp beverage importing 12distributor, and foreign importer, who imports alcoholic 13liquor or hemp beverage into the State, and each non-resident 14dealer who ships alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage into the 15State, to mail to the Department one duplicate invoice, 16together with a bill of lading, covering such shipment and 17stating the quantity and, except in the case of alcoholic 18liquor or hemp beverage imported in bulk to be bottled by an 19authorized licensee or registrant in this State using his own 20label and brand, the invoice shall also state the brand, 21labels and size of containers.22    It is the duty of each manufacturer, importing distributor 23and foreign importer, who imports spirits into the State, and 24each non-resident dealer who ships spirits into the State, to 25mail to the State Commission monthly a report containing a 26compilation of the information required to be furnished to the   SB1766- 31 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1Department by the preceding paragraph, except that information 2concerning spirits imported in bulk need not be included. The 3report shall include all information mailed to the Department 4during the preceding month.5    All books and records, which manufacturers, hemp beverage 6manufacturers, hemp beverage importing distributors, importing 7distributors, non-resident dealers, hemp beverage non-resident 8dealers, and foreign importers are required by this Section to 9keep, shall be preserved for a period of 3 years, unless the 10Department, in writing, authorizes their destruction or 11disposal at an earlier date.12(Source: P.A. 98-394, eff. 8-16-13.) 13    (235 ILCS 5/8-11)  (from Ch. 43, par. 164 1/2)14    Sec. 8-11. Every person licensed as a non-beverage user 15hereunder shall keep books and records which shall be 16available to investigators and/or auditors of the Department 17during regular business hours, and shall retain such books and 18records at his place of business in Illinois for a period of 19not less than three years. Such books and records shall be so 20kept as correctly to disclose: (a) the quantity and kind of 21alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages received, showing the name 22and address of the party from whom received and the permit 23number on which purchased; (b) the quantity and kind of 24alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages used; (c) the quantity and 25kind of alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages on hand at the   SB1766- 32 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1close of each business day; and (d) the names of products or 2purposes for which alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages are 3used.4    No non-beverage user shall sell, give away or otherwise 5dispose of any alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage purchased 6under his license as such non-beverage user, in any form fit 7for beverage purposes. Any non-beverage user who shall violate 8the provisions of this section shall pay as a penalty to the 9Department of Revenue, the sum of $1.50 for each gallon of 10alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage so diverted, and in addition 11thereto shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 1210-1 of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 83-1428.) 14    (235 ILCS 5/8-12)  (from Ch. 43, par. 164 3/4)15    Sec. 8-12. It shall be the duty of every railroad company, 16express company, common or contract carrier, and of every 17person, firm or corporation that shall bring, carry or 18transport alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages into the State 19of Illinois for delivery in said State or which are delivered 20in said State, to prepare and file with the Department of 21Revenue for each month, not later than the fifteenth day of the 22month following that for which it is made, a report stating 23therein the name of the company, carrier, person, firm or 24corporation making the report, the period of time covered by 25said report, the name and business address of each consignor   SB1766- 33 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1of such alcoholic liquors or hemp beverages, the name and 2business address of each consignee of such alcoholic liquors 3or hemp beverages, the kind and quantity of alcoholic liquors 4or hemp beverages delivered to each consignee, and the date or 5dates of delivery. Such report shall be made upon forms 6prescribed and made available by the Department and shall 7contain such other information as may reasonably be required 8by the Department. The Department may establish procedures for 9electronic transmissions of such information directly to the 10Department. Such reports or information received by the 11Department shall be made available by the Department to the 12Commission upon the Commission's request.13    In addition to any other reporting requirement imposed 14under this Section, reports shall be filed for shipments to 15end consumers in this State. In furtherance of this 16requirement, it shall be the duty of every railroad company, 17express company, common or contract carrier, person, firm, or 18corporation that brings, carries, or transports alcoholic 19liquor or hemp beverage into Illinois for delivery in Illinois 20to prepare and file with the Department for each month, not 21later than the fifteenth day of the month following the month 22during which the delivery is made, a report containing the 23name of the company, carrier, person, firm, or corporation 24making the report, the period of time covered by the report, 25the name and business address of each consignor of the 26alcoholic liquor or hemp beverage, the name and the address of   SB1766- 34 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1each consignee, and the date of delivery. Such reports shall 2be made upon forms prescribed and made by the Department and 3shall contain any other information that the Department may 4reasonably require. Such reports or information received by 5the Department shall be made available by the Department to 6the State Commission upon the State Commission's request.7    Every railroad company, express company, common or 8contract carrier, person, firm, or corporation filing or 9required to file a report under this Section shall deliver and 10make available to the Department, upon the Department's 11request, the records supporting the report, within 30 days of 12the request. The books, records, supporting papers and 13documents containing information and data relating to such 14reports shall be kept and preserved for a period of 3 three 15years, unless their destruction sooner is authorized, in 16writing, by the Director, and shall be open and available to 17inspection by the Director of Revenue or the Commission or any 18duly authorized officer, agent or employee of the Department 19or the Commission, at all times during business hours of the 20day.21    Any person who violates any of the provisions of this 22section or any of the rules and regulations of the Department 23for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of 24this section is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor. In case of a 25continuing violation each day's continuance thereof shall be a 26separate and distinct offense.  SB1766- 35 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1(Source: P.A. 92-380, eff. 1-1-02.) 2    (235 ILCS 5/8-14)  (from Ch. 43, par. 165a)3    Sec. 8-14. All of the provisions of Sections 5a, 5b, 5c, 45d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5h, 5i and 5j of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 5Act and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, 6are by reference incorporated in and made a part of this 7Article VIII as fully as though written herein; provided that 8wherever in those Sections of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 9Act, reference is made to a "retailer or hemp beverage 10retailer" such reference shall, for the purposes of this 11Article, be deemed to refer to a licensee or registrant 12licensee under this Act.13(Source: P.A. 87-205.) 14    (235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII heading new)15ARTICLE XIII. HEMP BEVERAGES 16    (235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 1 heading new)17Part 1. Construction; definitions; scope. 18    (235 ILCS 5/13-101 new)19    Sec. 13-101. Construction of Article. This Article shall 20be liberally construed, to the end that the health, safety, 21and welfare of the People of the State of Illinois shall be 22protected and temperance in the consumption of hemp beverages   SB1766- 36 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1shall be fostered and promoted by sound and careful control 2and regulation of the manufacture, sale, and distribution of 3non-alcoholic intoxicating beverages. 4    (235 ILCS 5/13-105 new)5    Sec. 13-105. Definitions. For purposes of this Article and 6Article 8 only:7    "Batch" means a specific quantity of a specific 8cannabinoid product that is manufactured during the same batch 9cycle.10    "Co-branded hemp beverages" means any hemp beverage 11containing the same or similar brand name, logo, or packaging 12as a non-intoxicating beverage.13    "Hemp beverage" means a finished product for sale to 14consumer within the State that contains up to 10 milligrams 15per individual container of no less than 7.5 ounces of delta-9 16tetrahydrocannabinol derived from any naturally occurring 17cannabinoids found in hemp, as hemp is defined in the 18Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018, Pub. L. No. 115-334, 132 19Stat. 4490 (2018), is intended for human consumption as a 20beverage, and meets the packaging, labeling, and testing 21requirements of this Article. A hemp beverage may only contain 22naturally derived delta-9 THC, CBD, CBG, THCv, or CBN.23    "Hemp beverage distributor" means a distributor licensed 24under this Act that has registered as a hemp beverage 25distributor under the applicable provisions of this Article. A   SB1766- 37 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1hemp beverage distributor may only make purchases from hemp 2beverage manufacturers and resell hemp beverages to hemp 3beverage retailers.4    "Hemp beverage importing distributor" means an importing 5distributor licensed under this Act that has registered as a 6hemp beverage importing distributor under the applicable 7provisions of this Article. A hemp beverage importing 8distributor may only make purchases from hemp beverage 9non-resident dealers.10    "Hemp beverage manufacturer" means a manufacturer licensed 11under this Act, or a non-licensee, that has registered as a 12manufacturer of hemp beverages within this State under the 13applicable provisions of this Article. A hemp beverage 14manufacturer may only make sales to hemp beverage distributors 15unless otherwise provided in this Article.16    "Hemp beverage non-resident dealer" means a non-resident 17dealer licensed under this Act, or a non-licensee, that has 18registered as manufacturer of hemp beverages without this 19State under the applicable provisions of this Article. A hemp 20beverage non-resident dealer may only make sales to hemp 21beverage importing distributors unless otherwise provided in 22this Article.23    "Hemp beverage retailer" means a retailer, brew pub, 24distilling pub, or wine-maker's premises licensed under this 25Act that has registered as a hemp beverage retailer under the 26applicable provisions of this Article and that may only make   SB1766- 38 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1purchases from hemp beverage distributors, self-distributing 2hemp beverage manufacturers, or hemp beverage non-resident 3dealers and may resell hemp beverages to non-licensees and 4non-registrants. For the purpose of further describing the 5type of business conducted at a hemp beverage retail premises, 6a hemp beverage retailer may be designated by the Hemp 7Beverage Commission as (i) an on-premises consumption hemp 8beverage retailer, (ii) an off-premise sale hemp beverage 9retailer, or (iii) a combined on-premises consumption and 10off-premises sale hemp beverage retailer.11    "Intermediate hemp product" means a product that is made 12from hemp concentrate or hemp extract that may only be sold to 13hemp manufacturers and not to non-registrants or non-licensees 14to be used as ingredients for other intermediate hemp products 15or hemp beverages.16    "Intoxicating beverages" includes alcoholic beverages and 17hemp beverages.18    "Non-alcoholic intoxicating beverage" means a hemp 19beverage.20    "Synthetic cannabinoid" means a cannabinoid-like compound 21that was produced using chemical synthesis, chemical 22modification, or chemical conversion, including in vitro 23biosynthesis or other bioconversion of such a method. 24"Synthetic cannabinoid" includes cannabinoids converted from 25one chemical structure into another, such as 26tetrahydrocannabinol produced by the conversion of   SB1766- 39 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1cannabidiol.2    "THC" means delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol derived from any 3naturally occurring cannabinoids found in hemp. 4    (235 ILCS 5/13-1010 new)5    Sec. 13-1010. Scope. No person shall manufacture, bottle, 6blend, sell, barter, transport, transfer into this State from 7a point outside this State, deliver, furnish, or possess any 8hemp beverage unless such person has registered with the Hemp 9Beverage Commission in compliance with this Article or except 10as otherwise specifically provided in this Article. 11    (235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 2 heading new)12Part 2. Hemp Beverage Commission. 13    (235 ILCS 5/13-201 new)14    Sec. 13-201. Creation of the Hemp Beverage Commission. 15There is hereby created a Hemp Beverage Commission, which 16shall be a division of the State Commission, consisting of 3 17members to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and 18consent of the Senate. The Executive Director of the State 19Commission shall be the Executive Director of the Hemp 20Beverage Commission. The Executive Director of the Hemp 21Beverage Commission shall have authority to use the staff of 22the State Commission to effectively administer this Article.   SB1766- 40 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    (235 ILCS 5/13-202 new)2    Sec. 13-202. Appointments; terms; vacancies. As soon as 3practical after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 4the 104th General Assembly, the Chairman of the State 5Commission shall be the Chairman of the Hemp Beverage 6Commission and, in addition, the Governor shall appoint one 7representative of the Department of Public Health and one 8representative of the Department of Agriculture. The Chairman 9shall hold office for the same term as Chairman of the State 10Commission and each other member to hold office for a period of 114 years. Except for the Chairman, at the expiration of the term 12of any commissioner, the Governor shall reappoint that 13commissioner or appoint a successor of that commissioner for a 14period of 6 years. 15    (235 ILCS 5/13-203 new)16    Sec. 13-203. Quorum; Secretary. A majority of the Hemp 17Beverage Commission shall constitute a quorum to transact 18business, but no vacancy shall impair the right of the 19remaining commissioners to exercise all of the powers of the 20Hemp Beverage Commission; and every act of a majority of the 21members of the Hemp Beverage Commission shall be deemed to be 22the act of the Hemp Beverage Commission. The secretary of the 23State Commission shall be the secretary of the Hemp Beverage 24Commission who shall keep a record of all proceedings, 25transactions, communications, and official acts of the Hemp   SB1766- 41 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1Beverage Commission and who shall be custodian of all records 2and perform such other duties as the Hemp Beverage Commission 3may prescribe. 4    (235 ILCS 5/13-204 new)5    Sec. 13-204. Authority and powers. The Hemp Beverage 6Commission shall have the same authority conferred upon the 7State Commission under this Act with respect to alcoholic 8liquor as provided in Sections 3-4 and 3-4.1 but only with 9respect to hemp beverages and shall use the personnel of the 10State Commission in the exercise of its authority under this 11Article. Sections 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9, 3-10, and 3-11 of 12this Act apply to the Hemp Beverage Commission. 13    (235 ILCS 5/13-205 new)14    Sec. 13-205. Additional powers and duties. The Hemp 15Beverage Commission shall have the same authority conferred 16upon the State Commission under this Act with respect to 17alcoholic liquor as provided in Section 3-12 with but only 18respect to hemp beverages. The Hemp Beverage Commission shall 19also have the following powers, functions, and duties:20    (1) To receive applications and approve registrations 21under this Article to hemp beverage manufacturers, hemp 22beverage non-resident dealers, hemp beverage importing 23distributors, hemp beverage distributors, on-premises 24consumption hemp beverage retailers, off-premises sale hemp   SB1766- 42 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1beverage retailers, and to suspend or revoke such 2registrations upon the Hemp Beverage Commission's 3determination, upon notice after hearing, that a registrant 4has violated any provision of this Act or any State law, local 5law, or rule or regulation issued pursuant thereto and in 6effect for 30 days prior to such violation relating to hemp 7beverages. Any action by the Hemp Beverage Commission to 8suspend or revoke a registration shall be limited to the 9registration related to hemp beverages. An action for a 10violation of this Article shall be commenced by the Hemp 11Beverage Commission within 2 years after the date the Hemp 12Beverage Commission knew or could have known of the violation.13    (2) To adopt such rules consistent with the provisions of 14this Article as it relates to hemp beverages that are 15necessary to carry on its functions and duties to the end that 16the health, safety and welfare of the People of the State of 17Illinois shall be protected and temperance in the consumption 18of hemp beverages shall be fostered and promoted and to 19distribute copies of such rules and regulations to all 20licensees affected thereby.21    (3)(A) A hemp beverage manufacturer or a hemp beverage 22non-resident dealer that annually manufactures less than 2325,000 gallons of hemp beverages may make application to the 24Hemp Beverage Commission for a self-distribution exemption to 25allow the sale of not more than 25,000 gallons per year of the 26exception holder's hemp beverages to retail licensees only.  SB1766- 43 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    (B) In the application for a self-distribution exemption, 2which shall be sworn under penalty of perjury, the hemp 3beverage manufacturer or hemp beverage non-resident dealer 4shall state (1) the date it was established; (2) its volume of 5hemp beverages manufactured and sold for each year since its 6establishment; (3) its efforts to establish hemp beverage 7distributor relationships; (4) that a self-distribution 8exemption is necessary to facilitate the marketing of its hemp 9beverages; and (5) that it will comply with the hemp beverage 10and revenue laws of the United States, this State, and any 11other state where it is licensed or registered.12    (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the Hemp 13Beverage Commission's website at least 45 days prior to action 14by the Hemp Beverage Commission. The Hemp Beverage Commission 15shall approve the application for a self-distribution 16exemption if the hemp beverage manufacturer or the hemp 17beverage non-resident dealer: (1) is in compliance with the 18State, revenue, and hemp beverage laws; (2) is not a member of 19any affiliated group that manufactures, directly or 20indirectly, more than 25,000 gallons of its hemp beverages; 21(3) shall not annually manufacture for sale more than 25,000 22of hemp beverages; (4) shall not annually sell more than 2325,000 gallons of its hemp beverages to hemp beverage 24retailers; and (5) pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 6-4 25of this Act, shall have the same privilege as beer 26manufacturers to sell hemp beverages, which the hemp beverage   SB1766- 44 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1manufacture has manufactured, to non-licensees at their 2manufacturing premises and may fill a container holding up to 315.5 gallons of hemp beverages for on-premises draft service, 4and may sell draft hemp beverages to non-licensees for 5on-premises consumption only in no less than 7.5 ounce serving 6sizes containing no more than 5 mg of THC per serving, except 7with respect to item (ii) of subsection (e) of Section 6-4, a 8hemp beverage manufacturer may not sell the hemp beverages it 9does not manufacture.10    (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall annually 11certify to the Hemp Beverage Commission its production of hemp 12beverages in the previous 12 months and its anticipated 13production and sales for the next 12 months. The Hemp Beverage 14Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a self-distribution 15exemption after a hearing if it finds that the exemption 16holder has made a material misrepresentation in its 17application, violated a revenue law of Illinois or hemp 18beverage laws, exceeded production of 25,000 gallons of hemp 19beverages, or become part of an affiliated group producing 20more than 25,000 gallons of hemp beverages.21    (E) Except in hearings for violations of this Article 22related to hemp beverages or bona fide investigation by duly 23sworn law enforcement officials, the Hemp Beverage Commission, 24or its agents, shall maintain the production and sales 25information of a self-distribution exemption holder as 26confidential and shall not release such information to any   SB1766- 45 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1person.2    (4) The Hemp Beverage Commission shall adopt rules 3governing self-distribution exemptions consistent with this 4Section and this Article.5    (5) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a hemp beverage 6manufacturer or hemp beverage non-resident dealer with a 7self-distribution exemption from entering into or 8simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 9registered hemp beverage distributor.10    (6) It is the intent of this Section to promote and 11continue orderly markets for all intoxicating beverages. The 12General Assembly finds that in order to preserve Illinois' 13regulatory distribution system, it is necessary to create an 14exception for smaller manufacturers in order to afford and 15allow such smaller manufacturers of hemp beverages access to 16the marketplace in order to develop a customer base without 17impairing the integrity of the 3-tier system. 18    (235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 3 heading new)19Part 3. Registration. 20    (235 ILCS 5/13-301 new)21    Sec. 13-301. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit may 22not regulate hemp beverages or the registrants under this 23Article. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 24Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the   SB1766- 46 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 2exercised by the State. A non-home rule municipality may not 3regulate hemp beverages or registrants pursuant to this 4Article. Accordingly, Article 4 of this Act shall not apply to 5registrations pursuant to this Article. Article 7 shall not 6apply to registrations except with respect to Sections 7-2, 77-3, 7-4, 7-6, 7-10, 7-11, and 7-14, which shall apply to hemp 8beverages in the same manner as alcoholic beverages. Article 9 9of this Act does not apply to registrations. 10    (235 ILCS 5/13-302 new)11    Sec. 13-302. Registration issuance. If an applicant for 12registration as a hemp beverage manufacturer, a hemp beverage 13non-resident dealer, a hemp beverage importing distributor, 14hemp beverage distributor, or a hemp beverage retailer is a 15licensee under the applicable provisions of this Act, and has 16made application to the Hemp Beverage Commission in conformity 17with this Article and paid the registration fee required, it 18shall be the duty of the Hemp Beverage Commission to issue a 19hemp beverage registration to that applicant; except that, the 20Hemp Beverage Commission shall refuse the issuance to a person 21not licensed as a manufacturer of alcoholic liquor within this 22State, as a non-resident dealer, as an importing distributor, 23as a distributor, as a retailer, except as provided in Section 2413-304, or upon renewal of applicable license under this Act, 25upon notice and after hearing, upon the grounds authorized in   SB1766- 47 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1Section 6-3 of this Act, and, provided further, that the 2issuance of such registration shall not prejudice the Hemp 3Beverage Commission's action in subsequently suspending or 4revoking such registration if it is determined by the Hemp 5Beverage Commission, upon notice and after hearing, that the 6registration has, within the same or the preceding 7registration period, violated any provision of this Article or 8any rule adopted thereunder and in effect for 30 days prior to 9such violation. The Hemp Beverage Commission shall suspend or 10revoke a registration if the State Commission has suspended or 11revoked the license of a registrant under this Article. The 12Hemp Beverage Commission shall not have the authority to fine, 13suspend, or revoke any liquor license issued pursuant to this 14Act. The Hemp Beverage Commission shall refuse to renew a 15registration if as a registrant or a licensee has failed to pay 16an offer in compromise, pre-disciplinary settlement, or a fine 17imposed by order of the State Commission or the Hemp Beverage 18Commission. 19    (235 ILCS 5/13-303 new)20    Sec. 13-303. Registration approval. Any applicant for 21registration licensed as a manufacturer, a non-resident 22dealer, an importing distributor, a distributor, or a retailer 23shall register with the Hemp Beverage Commission in a form and 24in a manner prescribed by the Hemp Beverage Commission. The 25Hemp Beverage Commission shall approve any application for   SB1766- 48 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1registration within 14 days upon the applicant providing 2evidence that: (1) the applicant is duly licensed by the State 3Commission pursuant to this Act; (2) the applicant is licensed 4as a manufacturer, non-resident dealer, importing distributor, 5distributor, or retailer; (3) the applicant is in good 6standing with the Department of Revenue; and (4) provides 7affirmation that it is in compliance with the requirements in 8this Article. 9    (235 ILCS 5/13-304 new)10    Sec. 13-304. Registration application. Any applicant that 11manufactures hemp beverages within this State or outside this 12State, if not licensed under this Act, and no other person, may 13submit an application for registration to the Hemp Beverage 14Commission in a form and in a manner prescribed by the Hemp 15Beverage Commission. The Hemp Beverage Commission shall have 16authority to administer any application and to issue rules 17relating to the process, approval and in the event of denial, a 18hearing regarding any denial of an application for 19registration. Any denial by the Hemp Beverage Commission is 20subject to the Administrative Review Law. 21    (235 ILCS 5/13-305 new)22    Sec. 13-305. Registration classifications. 23    (a) Registration issued by the Hemp Beverage Commission 24shall be of the following classes and fees:  SB1766- 49 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1        (1) Hemp beverage manufacturer; fee $2,500.2        (2) Hemp beverage non-resident dealer; fee $2,500.3        (3) Hemp beverage importing distributor; fee $1,250.4        (4) Hemp beverage distributor; fee $1,250.5        (5) Hemp beverage retailer; fee $750.6    This subsection (a) is inoperative on and after January 1, 72031.8    (b) Beginning January 1, 2031, registration issued by the 9Hemp Beverage Commission shall be of the following classes and 10fees:11        (1) Hemp beverage manufacturer; fee $500.12        (2) Hemp beverage non-resident dealer; fee $250.13        (3) Hemp beverage importing distributor; fee $250.14        (4) Hemp beverage distributor; fee $250.15        (5) Hemp beverage retailer; fee $100.16    (b-5) Fees collected under this Section shall be paid into 17the Dram Shop Fund.18    (c) Registrations shall be valid from the date of issuance 19through the last day of the 11th month that begins after the 20month in which the registration is issued unless sooner 21revoked or suspended as provided in this Act. Registrations 22shall state thereon the class to which they belong, the names 23of the registrant, and the addresses and description of the 24premises for which they are granted and shall state the dates 25of their issuance and expiration.26    (d) In the event of the loss or destruction of a   SB1766- 50 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1registration certificate issued pursuant to this Section, the 2Hemp Beverage Commission, upon written application stating 3such fact and accompanied by the required fee, shall issue a 4duplicate of the registration. A duplicate registration must 5also be obtained if a registrant is transferring a 6registration with its license pursuant to Section 7-14. The 7fee for the issuance of a duplicate registration shall be $12 8if the original registration fee was $200 or less and $24 if 9the original registration fee was more than $200.10    (e) If a registrant fails to submit a registration renewal 11application to the Hemp Beverage Commission before or on the 12expiration date of the current registration, the registrant 13shall be assessed a late filing fee of $25. Late applications 14and instruments of payment shall be returned to the 15registrant. Late filing fees shall be in addition to any fines 16or penalties ordered for operating without a valid 17registration. 18    (235 ILCS 5/13-306 new)19    Sec. 13-306. Hemp manufacturer registration. A hemp 20manufacturer registration shall allow the manufacture, 21importation in bulk, storage, distribution, and sale of hemp 22beverages to persons without the State, as may be permitted by 23law and to hemp registrants in this State as follows:24        (1) A hemp beverage manufacturer may make sales and 25    deliveries of hemp beverages to hemp beverage   SB1766- 51 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    distributors, hemp beverage non-resident dealers, and to 2    importing distributors in containers not larger than 16 3    fluid ounces, including any hemp beverages that subsection 4    (e) of Section 6-4 authorizes a hemp beverage manufacturer 5    to sell in its original package only to a non-registrant 6    or non-licensee for pick-up by a non-registrant or 7    non-licensee either within the interior of the hemp 8    beverage manufacturer premises or at outside of the hemp 9    beverage manufacturer premises at a curb-side or parking 10    lot adjacent to the hemp beverage manufacturer premises.11        (2) A hemp beverage distributor's registration shall 12    allow the wholesale purchase from hemp beverage 13    manufacturers and storage of hemp beverages and sale of 14    hemp beverages to hemp beverage retailers in this State 15    and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by 16    law. No person licensed as a distributor shall be granted 17    a hemp beverage non-resident dealer's license.18        (3) A hemp beverage importing distributor shall allow 19    the importation of hemp beverages by the registrant into 20    this State from any point in the United States outside 21    this State, and the purchase of hemp beverage in 22    containers not more than 16 fluid ounces. The hemp 23    beverage importing distributor's registration shall permit 24    such registrant to purchase hemp beverages from Illinois 25    hemp beverage non-resident dealers only. No person 26    licensed as a hemp beverage importing distributor shall be   SB1766- 52 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    granted a hemp beverage non-resident dealer's license.2        (4) A hemp beverage retailer's registration shall 3    allow the registrant to sell and offer for sale at retail, 4    only in the premises specified in the retail liquor 5    license, hemp beverages not to exceed 5 mg of THC in a 6    container not less than 7.5 ounces for on-premises 7    consumption and not to exceed 10 mg of THC in a container 8    not less than 7.5 ounces for off-premises consumption, but 9    not for resale in any form. 10    (235 ILCS 5/13-307 new)11    Sec. 13-307. Prohibitions.12    (a) It is a violation of this Article for any hemp beverage 13retailer to deliver to a non-licensee or non-registrant for 14on-premises consumption any hemp beverage in combination, in 15any way, with any alcoholic beverage.16    (b) All permitted happy hours under Section 6-28.5 are 17prohibited in connection with hemp beverages.18    (c) All sales to non-registrants and non-licensees of any 19hemp beverages shall be in person and may not be given, sold, 20transferred, or delivered to any non-registrant or 21non-licensee via any electronic or Internet marketplace, or 22any location outside of the registrant's premises other than 23as provided in this Article. A hemp beverage retailer may not 24ship or deliver hemp beverages.25    (d) A hemp beverage manufacturer registration shall only   SB1766- 53 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1permit the manufacturer to sell hemp beverages at retail on 2the premises actually occupied by the hemp beverage 3manufacturer.4    (e) No hemp beverage may be given, sold, transferred, or 5delivered to any person under 21 years of age. A hemp beverage 6retailer shall refuse to sell hemp beverage to any person 7unless the person produces a government-issued identification 8showing that the person is 21 years of age or older, which must 9be verified at the point of sale.10    (f) No person shall process, manufacture, label, 11distribute for sale, sell, offer for sale, market, or 12advertise any hemp beverage within this State without 13obtaining a registration under this Article.14    (g) A registrant shall distribute for sale or offer for 15sale intermediate hemp products to a person or entity that is 16not registered as a hemp beverage manufacturer under this 17Article. A registrant shall not market or advertise 18intermediate hemp products for purchase by any hemp beverage 19retailer, non-licensee, or non-registrant.20    (h) A registrant shall not process, manufacture, 21distribute for sale, sell, offer for sale, market, or 22advertise any hemp beverage unless the product complies with 23the labeling, packaging, minimum testing, and other 24requirements of this Article and any administrative rules 25adopted by the Hemp Beverage Commission.26    (i) A product that has a THC concentration greater than   SB1766- 54 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1the limits of 10 mg in a container not less than 7.5 ounces set 2forth for hemp beverages shall be regulated as cannabis as 3defined in the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, whether or not 4the product is made with or derived from hemp, industrial 5hemp, or derived from natural or synthetic sources.6    (j) Hemp beverages shall not be sold within this State if 7hemp cannabinoid, THC, or other contaminants are detected at 8levels greater than provided for by this Article or rules or 9guidance adopted by the Department of Public Health. 10    (235 ILCS 5/13-308 new)11    Sec. 13-308. Hemp beverage requirements.12    (a) Hemp beverages manufactured, processed, distributed, 13sold, or offered for sale in this State shall:14        (1) be manufactured in accordance with this Article;15        (2) be subject to the following minimum requirements:16            (A) contain a total THC concentration of no 17        greater than 10 mg in a container not less than 7.5 18        ounces, and 60 mg of THC per package for products sold 19        in multiple servings or units, for any beverage that 20        is intended for human consumption by any means;21            (B) not contain any alcoholic liquor;22            (C) not contain added caffeine, tobacco, or 23        nicotine in the product;24            (D) accurately reflect testing results and not 25        contain less than 90% or more than 110% of the   SB1766- 55 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1        concentration of total cannabinoid content as listed 2        on the product label;3            (E) be prepackaged and not added to food or any 4        other consumable products at the point of sale; and5            (F) comply with product testing standards set 6        forth in this Article.7    (b) A hemp beverage manufacturer shall do all of the 8following with regard to hemp beverages manufactured, 9processed, distributed, sold, or offered for sale in this 10State: 11        (A) maintain sufficient records to demonstrate that 12    any hemp or hemp extract used by the licensee was grown, 13    derived, extracted, and transported in accordance with 14    applicable laws and licensing requirement of the 15    jurisdiction or jurisdictions from which such hemp or hemp 16    extract was sourced and for hemp received from an 17    out-of-state grower, processors shall also maintain 18    records of the out-of-state grower registration or license 19    number in the respective jurisdiction;20        (B) keep all designated extracting and manufacturing 21    areas safe and sanitary, including, but not limited to, 22    ensuring that those areas are adequately lit, cleaned, and 23    smoke-free;24        (C) not use, in the extraction or manufacturing of any 25    hemp beverage, synthetic cannabinoids, artificially 26    derived cannabinoids, or tetrahydrocannabinol created   SB1766- 56 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    through isomerization;2        (D) maintain any and all records required by this Act 3    for at least 3 years and immediately produce such records 4    upon request of the Hemp Beverage Commission; and5        (E) be intended for consumption as a beverage and not 6    derived from any powder.7    (c) The Hemp Beverage Commission may adopt rules in 8accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and 9prescribe forms relating to the administration and enforcement 10of this Article as it deems appropriate. The Hemp Beverage 11Commission and the Department of Revenue shall implement the 12applicable provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th 13General Assembly on or before January 1, 2026. 14    (235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 4 heading new)15Part 4. Labeling; testing; advertising. 16    (235 ILCS 5/13-401 new)17    Sec. 13-401. Hemp beverage labeling and testing standards.18    (a) A hemp beverage distributed or offered for retail sale 19in this State shall include the following information on the 20product label or packaging:21        (1) information that complies with the requirements of 22    21 CFR 101 and a nutritional or supplement fact panel that 23    is based on the number of servings within the container;24        (2) a list of all ingredients in descending order of   SB1766- 57 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    predominance by weight in the product;2        (3) the serving size and number of servings per 3    package or container, including the milligrams per serving 4    of:5            (A) individual hemp cannabinoids;6            (B) total hemp cannabinoids;7            (C) individual THC cannabinoids; and8            (D) total THC;9        (4) a batch number or code;10        (5) the expiration date of the hemp beverage;11        (6) the name of the business for whom the product is 12    produced;13        (7) a scannable QR code linked to download the 14    certificate of analysis and testing results for the 15    product; and16        (8) any other marking, statement, or symbol required 17    by the Hemp Beverage Commission.18    (b) No hemp beverage offered for retail sale shall be made 19attractive to individuals under 21 years of age, imitate a 20candy label, or use cartoons or other images popularly used to 21advertise to children or otherwise be marketed to individuals 22under 21 years of age.23    (c) No hemp beverage shall be marketed, advertised, or 24offered for sale in a manner that:25        (1) would cause a reasonable consumer to be confused 26    as to whether the hemp beverage is trademarked, marked, or   SB1766- 58 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    labeled in a manner that violates any federal trademark 2    law or regulation;3        (2) would cause a reasonable consumer to believe that 4    a hemp beverage product is cannabis, medical cannabis, or 5    that a registrant is authorized to sell or dispense 6    cannabis or medical cannabis, as those terms are defined 7    in the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or the 8    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act;9        (3) is false or misleading;10        (4) promotes excessive consumption;11        (5) depicts a person under 21 years of age consuming 12    cannabis or hemp beverage;13        (6) includes the image of a cannabis leaf or hemp 14    leaf, however, cannabis leaves when used as part of a 15    warning are exempt from this prohibition;16        (7) includes any image designed or likely to appeal to 17    minors, including cartoons, fruits, toys, animals, or 18    children, or any other likeness to images, characters, or 19    phrases that are popularly used to advertise to children, 20    or any packaging or labeling that bears reasonable 21    resemblance to any product available for consumption as a 22    commercially available candy or that promotes consumption 23    of cannabis or hemp beverage;24        (8) includes any image or name of an alcoholic 25    beverage, or any other likeness to images, characters, or 26    phrases that are popularly used to advertise alcoholic   SB1766- 59 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    beverages; or2        (9) contains any seal, flag, crest, coat of arms, or 3    other insignia likely to mislead the purchaser to believe 4    that the product has been endorsed, made, or used by the 5    State or any of its representatives, except when 6    authorized by this Article.7    (d) Hemp beverages offered for retail sale shall include 8the following warnings on the product label or packaging in a 9manner that is clear and conspicuous:10        (1) this product must be kept out of the reach of 11    children and pets;12        (2) this product is derived from hemp and may contain 13    THC which could result in a failed drug test;14        (3) this product has not been evaluated or approved by 15    the Food and Drug Administration for safety or efficacy; 16    and17        (4) if you are pregnant or nursing you should consult 18    your health care provider before use.19    (e) All hemp beverage shall be tested by a laboratory with 20a valid ISO/IEC 17025 accreditation for the premises and for 21the testing of one or more of the analytes; maintain a valid 22scope of accreditation, issued by an accreditation body, that 23attests to the laboratory's competence to perform testing of 24hemp cannabinoid products; maintain method validation reports 25for all testing performed; maintain standard operating 26procedures for the sampling of hemp cannabinoid products; and   SB1766- 60 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1maintain testing methodologies to ascertain the presence of 2intermediate hemp products, hemp extract or hemp concentrate.3    (f) The Hemp Beverage Commission shall make available a 4list of required analytes, their acceptable limits, and 5approved testing methods on the Hemp Beverage Commission's 6website and in any other manner as determined by the Hemp 7Beverage Commission.8    (g) The total THC concentration for hemp beverage shall 9not exceed the limits established in this Article. 10    (235 ILCS 5/13-402 new)11    Sec. 13-402. Hemp beverage advertising requirements. An 12advertisement or display for hemp beverages shall not:13        (1) include any false or misleading statements, 14    images, or other content, including, but not limited to, 15    any health claims;16        (2) contain claims that hemp consumption or a hemp 17    beverage can or is intended to diagnose, cure, mitigate, 18    treat, or prevent disease;19        (3) lead a reasonable consumer to believe that a hemp 20    cannabinoid product is cannabis or medical cannabis, 21    including any product that exceeds the THC limits 22    established under this Article for lawful hemp cannabinoid 23    products, or that a registrant is authorized to sell or 24    dispense cannabis or medical cannabis;25        (4) have the purpose or effect of targeting or being   SB1766- 61 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    attractive to individuals under 21 years of age. The use 2    of images of children or minors consuming hemp beverage 3    products and the use of words, designs, or brands that 4    resemble products commonly associated with children or 5    minors, or marketed to children or minors, is prohibited; 6    or7        (5) lead a reasonable person to believe that a hemp 8    cannabinoid product is an alcoholic product, including any 9    image of an alcoholic beverage, or any other likeness to 10    images, characters, names, or phrases that are popularly 11    used to advertise alcoholic beverages. 12    (235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 5 heading new)13Part. 5. Applicability of other provisions. 14    (235 ILCS 5/13-501 new)15    Sec. 13-501. Applicability to registrants and 16non-licensees. To the extent a person is a registrant or 17non-licensee under this Act, Article VI and Article X of this 18Act shall apply to the registrant in the same manner as a 19manufacturer that is a brewer with a hemp beverage 20registration, unless otherwise provided in this Article. 21    (235 ILCS 5/13-502 new)22    Sec. 13-502. Merchandising credits. Pursuant to Section 236-5, a hemp beverage retailer may receive a merchandising   SB1766- 62 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1credit of no more than 30 days from any hemp beverage 2manufacturer, hemp beverage non-resident dealer, hemp beverage 3importing distributor, or hemp beverage distributor. 4    (235 ILCS 5/13-503 new)5    Sec. 13-503. Co-branded hemp beverages. In addition to the 6applicable sections of this Article, co-branded hemp beverages 7are subject to the restrictions for alcoholic beverages set 8forth in Section 6-35.2. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.  SB1766- 63 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    235 ILCS 5/8-14    235 ILCS 5/8-2from Ch. 43, par. 1595    235 ILCS 5/8-4from Ch. 43, par. 1636    235 ILCS 5/8-5from Ch. 43, par. 163a7    235 ILCS 5/8-6from Ch. 43, par. 163b8    235 ILCS 5/8-7from Ch. 43, par. 163c9    235 ILCS 5/8-9from Ch. 43, par. 163e10    235 ILCS 5/8-10from Ch. 43, par. 16411    235 ILCS 5/8-11from Ch. 43, par. 164 1/212    235 ILCS 5/8-12from Ch. 43, par. 164 3/413    235 ILCS 5/8-14from Ch. 43, par. 165a14    235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII 15    heading new16    235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 1 17    heading new18    235 ILCS 5/13-101 new19    235 ILCS 5/13-105 new20    235 ILCS 5/13-1010 new21    235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 2 22    heading new23    235 ILCS 5/13-201 new24    235 ILCS 5/13-202 new25    235 ILCS 5/13-203 new  SB1766- 64 -LRB104 10504 RPS 20579 b1    235 ILCS 5/13-204 new2    235 ILCS 5/13-205 new3    235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 3 4    heading new5    235 ILCS 5/13-301 new6    235 ILCS 5/13-302 new7    235 ILCS 5/13-303 new8    235 ILCS 5/13-304 new9    235 ILCS 5/13-305 new10    235 ILCS 5/13-306 new11    235 ILCS 5/13-307 new12    235 ILCS 5/13-308 new13    235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 4 14    heading new15    235 ILCS 5/13-401 new16    235 ILCS 5/13-402 new17    235 ILCS 5/Art. XIII Pt. 5 18    heading new19    235 ILCS 5/13-501 new20    235 ILCS 5/13-502 new21    235 ILCS 5/13-503 new